Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5107.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 5. (1) 1. Notwithstanding any other law or provision of
this act, and except as otherwise provided in section 4, of this
act, the following acts by a person who is 21 years of age or older
are not unlawful, are not an offense, are not grounds for seizing
or forfeiting property, are not grounds for arrest, prosecution, or
penalty in any manner, are not grounds for search or inspection,
and are not grounds to deny any other right or privilege:
(a) except as permitted by Subject to subdivision (b),
possessing, using or consuming, internally possessing, purchasing,
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3


transporting, or processing 2.5 ounces or less of marihuana, except
that not more than 15 grams of the marihuana may be in the form of
marihuana concentrate. ;
(b) within All of the following within the person's residence:
, possessing,
(i) Possessing, storing, and processing not more than 10 ounces
of marihuana, and any except that not more than 200 grams of the
marihuana may be in the form of marihuana concentrate.
(ii) Possessing, storing, and processing not more than 2.5
kilograms of marihuana produced by marihuana plants cultivated on
the premises, except that not more than 200 grams of the marihuana
may be in the form of marihuana concentrate. and cultivating
(iii) Cultivating not more than 12 marihuana plants for personal
use, provided that no not more than 12 marihuana plants are
possessed, cultivated, or processed on the premises at once;the
same time.
(c) assisting Assisting another person who is 21 years of age
or older in any of the acts described in this section. ; and
(d) giving Giving away or otherwise transferring without
remuneration up to 2.5 ounces of marihuana, except that not more
than 15 grams of marihuana may be in the form of marihuana
concentrate, to a person who is 21 years of age or older, as long
as the transfer is not advertised or promoted to the public.
(2) 2. Notwithstanding any other law or provision of this act,
except as otherwise provided in section 4, of this act, the use,
manufacture, possession, and purchase of marihuana accessories by a
person who is 21 years of age or older and the distribution or sale
of marihuana accessories to a person who is 21 years of age or
older is authorized, is not unlawful, is not an offense, is not
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3


grounds for seizing or forfeiting property, is not grounds for
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, and is not grounds
to deny any other right or privilege.
(3) 3. A person shall must not be denied custody of or
visitation with a minor for conduct that is permitted by this act,
unless the person's behavior is such that it creates an
unreasonable danger to the minor that can be clearly articulated
and substantiated.
Sec. 15. A person who commits any of the following acts, and
who is not otherwise authorized by this act to conduct such
activities, commit the acts, may be punished only as provided in
this section and is not subject to any other form of punishment or
disqualification, unless the person consents to another disposition
authorized by law:
(a) 1. Except for a person who engaged in conduct described in
sections section 4(1)(a), 4(1)(b), 4(1)(c), 4(1)(d), 4(1)(g), or
4(1)(h), (b), (c), (d), (g), or (h), a person who possesses not
more than the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5, cultivates
not more than the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5,
delivers without receiving any remuneration to a person who is at
least 21 years of age or older not more than the amount of
marihuana allowed by section 5, or possesses with intent to deliver
not more than the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5, is
responsible for a civil infraction and may be punished by a fine of
not more than $100 $100.00 and forfeiture of the marihuana.
(b) 2. Except for a person who engaged in conduct described in
section 4, a person who possesses not more than twice 2 times the
amount of marihuana allowed by section 5, cultivates not more than
twice 2 times the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5,
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3


delivers without receiving any remuneration to a person who is at
least 21 years of age or older not more than twice 2 times the
amount of marihuana allowed by section 5, or possesses with intent
to deliver not more than twice 2 times the amount of marihuana
allowed by section 5, may be punished as follows:
(i) (a) for For a first violation, the person is responsible
for a civil infraction and may be punished by a fine of not more
than $500 $500.00 and forfeiture of the marihuana. ;
(ii) (b) for For a second violation, the person is responsible
for a civil infraction and may be punished by a fine of not more
than $1,000 $1,000.00 and forfeiture of the marihuana. ;
(iii) (c) for For a third or subsequent violation, the person is
guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine of not more
than $2,000 $2,000.00 and forfeiture of the marihuana.
(c) 3. Except for a person who engaged in conduct described by
in section 4(1)(a), 4(1)(d), or 4(1)(g), (d), or (g), a person
under younger than 21 years of age who possesses not more than 2.5
ounces of marihuana or who cultivates not more than 12 marihuana
plants may be punished as follows:
(i) (a) for For a first violation, the person is responsible
for a civil infraction and may be punished as follows:
(A) (1) if If the person is less younger than 18 years of age,
by a fine of not more than $100 $100.00 or community service,
forfeiture of the marihuana, and completion of 4 hours of drug
education or counseling. ; or
(B) (2) if If the person is at least 18 years of age or older,
by a fine of not more than $100 $100.00 and forfeiture of the
marihuana.
(ii) (b) for For a second violation, the person is responsible
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3


for a civil infraction and may be punished as follows:
(A) (1) if If the person is less younger than 18 years of age,
by a fine of not more than $500 $500.00 or community service,
forfeiture of the marihuana, and completion of 8 hours of drug
education or counseling. ; or
(B) (2) if If the person is at least 18 years of age or older,
by a fine of not more than $500 $500.00 and forfeiture of the
marihuana.
(d) 4. Except for a person who engaged in conduct described in
section 4, a person who possesses more than twice 2 times or more
of the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5 but less than 17.5
kilograms of marihuana or less than 1.75 kilograms of marihuana
concentrate, cultivates more than twice 2 times or more of the
amount of marihuana allowed by section 5 but fewer than 35
marihuana plants, or delivers without receiving any remuneration to
a person who is at least 21 years of age more than twice or older 2
times or more of the amount of marihuana allowed by section 5,
shall be responsible for is guilty of a misdemeanor , but shall not
be subject to imprisonment unless the violation was habitual,
willful, and for a commercial purpose or the violation involved
violence.punishable by 1 or both of the following:
(i) Imprisonment for not more than 93 days if either of the
following conditions is met:
(A) The person was convicted of a violation of this
subdivision, subdivision (e), or section 7401 of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401, during the 7-year period
immediately preceding the date of the violation.
(B) The person has been convicted of 2 or more violations of
any combination of this subdivision, subdivision (e), or section
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3


7401 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401.
(ii) A fine of not more than $10,000.00.
(e) Except for a person who engaged in conduct described in
section 4, a person who possesses 17.5 kilograms or more but 25
kilograms or less of marihuana, possesses 1.75 kilograms or more
but 2.5 kilograms or less of marihuana concentrate, or cultivates
35 or more but 50 or fewer marihuana plants is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by 1 or both of the following:
(i) Imprisonment for not more than 180 days if either of the
following conditions is met:
(A) The person was convicted of a violation of this
subdivision, subdivision (d), or section 7401 of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401, during the 7-year period
immediately preceding the date of the violation.
(B) The person has been convicted of 2 or more violations of
any combination of this subdivision, subdivision (d), or section
7401 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401.
(ii) A fine of not more than $20,000.00.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5105 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
BJH H04433'25 (H-1) jhk5d3